Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-702
Property Tax Administrator; qualifications; duties.

(1) The Governor shall appoint a Property Tax Administrator with the approval of a majority of the members of the Legislature. The Property Tax Administrator shall have experience and training in the fields of taxation and property appraisal and shall meet all the qualifications required for members of the Tax Equalization and Review Commission under subsections (1) and (2) of section 77-5004.

(2) In addition to any duties, powers, or responsibilities otherwise conferred upon the Property Tax Administrator, he or she shall administer and enforce all laws related to the state supervision of local property tax administration and the central assessment of property subject to property taxation. The Property Tax Administrator shall also advise county assessors regarding the administration and assessment of taxable property within the state and measure assessment performance in order to determine the accuracy and uniformity of assessments.

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 22;

Laws 2001, LB 465, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 44;

Laws 2011, LB210, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB384, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB512, § 12.